test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VINIT_INDEP_aakozi_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     aakozi: aakozi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     Px1+aakozi: niaakozi
     Px2+aakozi: giaakozi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     aakozi+Neg: aakozisii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     aakozi+1Pl: aakozimin
     aakozi+2Pl: aakozim
     aakozi+Px3: aakoziw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     aakozi+Dub: aakozidig
     aakozi+Pret: aakoziban
     aakozi+PretDub: aakozigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     aakozi+3Obv: aakozian
     aakozi+3Pl: aakoziag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     Px1+aakozi+Neg: niaakozisii
     Px2+aakozi+Neg: giaakozisii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl: niaakozimin
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl: niaakozim
     Px1+aakozi+Px3: niaakoziw
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl: giaakozimin
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl: giaakozim
     Px2+aakozi+Px3: giaakoziw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     Px1+aakozi+Dub: niaakozidig
     Px1+aakozi+Pret: niaakoziban
     Px1+aakozi+PretDub: niaakozigoban
     Px2+aakozi+Dub: giaakozidig
     Px2+aakozi+Pret: giaakoziban
     Px2+aakozi+PretDub: giaakozigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     Px1+aakozi+3Obv: niaakozian
     Px1+aakozi+3Pl: niaakoziag
     Px2+aakozi+3Obv: giaakozian
     Px2+aakozi+3Pl: giaakoziag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl: aakozisiimin
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl: aakozisiim
     aakozi+Neg+Px3: aakozisiiw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     aakozi+Neg+Dub: aakozisiidig
     aakozi+Neg+Pret: aakozisiiban
     aakozi+Neg+PretDub: aakozisiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     aakozi+Neg+3Obv: aakozisiian
     aakozi+Neg+3Pl: aakozisiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     aakozi+1Pl+Dub: aakozimindig
     aakozi+1Pl+Pret: aakoziminban
     aakozi+1Pl+PretDub: aakozimingoban
     aakozi+2Pl+Dub: aakozimdig
     aakozi+2Pl+Pret: aakozimban
     aakozi+2Pl+PretDub: aakozimgoban
     aakozi+Px3+Dub: aakoziwdig
     aakozi+Px3+Pret: aakoziwban
     aakozi+Px3+PretDub: aakoziwgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     aakozi+1Pl+3Obv: aakoziminan
     aakozi+1Pl+3Pl: aakoziminag
     aakozi+2Pl+3Obv: aakoziman
     aakozi+2Pl+3Pl: aakozimag
     aakozi+Px3+3Obv: aakoziwan
     aakozi+Px3+3Pl: aakoziwag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     aakozi+Dub+3Obv: aakozidigan
     aakozi+Dub+3Pl: aakozidigag
     aakozi+Pret+3Obv: aakozibanan
     aakozi+Pret+3Pl: aakozibanag
     aakozi+PretDub+3Obv: aakozigobanan
     aakozi+PretDub+3Pl: aakozigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl: niaakozisiimin
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl: niaakozisiim
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3: niaakozisiiw
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl: giaakozisiimin
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl: giaakozisiim
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3: giaakozisiiw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Dub: niaakozisiidig
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Pret: niaakozisiiban
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+PretDub: niaakozisiigoban
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Dub: giaakozisiidig
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Pret: giaakozisiiban
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+PretDub: giaakozisiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+3Obv: niaakozisiian
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+3Pl: niaakozisiiag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+3Obv: giaakozisiian
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+3Pl: giaakozisiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+Dub: niaakozimindig
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+Pret: niaakoziminban
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+PretDub: niaakozimingoban
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+Dub: niaakozimdig
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+Pret: niaakozimban
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+PretDub: niaakozimgoban
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+Dub: niaakoziwdig
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+Pret: niaakoziwban
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+PretDub: niaakoziwgoban
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+Dub: giaakozimindig
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+Pret: giaakoziminban
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+PretDub: giaakozimingoban
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+Dub: giaakozimdig
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+Pret: giaakozimban
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+PretDub: giaakozimgoban
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+Dub: giaakoziwdig
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+Pret: giaakoziwban
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+PretDub: giaakoziwgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+3Obv: niaakoziminan
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+3Pl: niaakoziminag
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+3Obv: niaakoziman
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+3Pl: niaakozimag
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+3Obv: niaakoziwan
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+3Pl: niaakoziwag
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+3Obv: giaakoziminan
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+3Pl: giaakoziminag
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+3Obv: giaakoziman
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+3Pl: giaakozimag
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+3Obv: giaakoziwan
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+3Pl: giaakoziwag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     Px1+aakozi+Dub+3Obv: niaakozidigan
     Px1+aakozi+Dub+3Pl: niaakozidigag
     Px1+aakozi+Pret+3Obv: niaakozibanan
     Px1+aakozi+Pret+3Pl: niaakozibanag
     Px1+aakozi+PretDub+3Obv: niaakozigobanan
     Px1+aakozi+PretDub+3Pl: niaakozigobanag
     Px2+aakozi+Dub+3Obv: giaakozidigan
     Px2+aakozi+Dub+3Pl: giaakozidigag
     Px2+aakozi+Pret+3Obv: giaakozibanan
     Px2+aakozi+Pret+3Pl: giaakozibanag
     Px2+aakozi+PretDub+3Obv: giaakozigobanan
     Px2+aakozi+PretDub+3Pl: giaakozigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Dub: aakozisiimindig
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret: aakozisiiminban
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+PretDub: aakozisiimingoban
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Dub: aakozisiimdig
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret: aakozisiimban
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+PretDub: aakozisiimgoban
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+Dub: aakozisiiwdig
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+Pret: aakozisiiwban
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+PretDub: aakozisiiwgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+3Obv: aakozisiiminan
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+3Pl: aakozisiiminag
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+3Obv: aakozisiiman
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+3Pl: aakozisiimag
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+3Obv: aakozisiiwan
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+3Pl: aakozisiiwag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5
     aakozi+Neg+Dub+3Obv: aakozisiidigan
     aakozi+Neg+Dub+3Pl: aakozisiidigag
     aakozi+Neg+Pret+3Obv: aakozisiibanan
     aakozi+Neg+Pret+3Pl: aakozisiibanag
     aakozi+Neg+PretDub+3Obv: aakozisiigobanan
     aakozi+Neg+PretDub+3Pl: aakozisiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     aakozi+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: aakozimindigan
     aakozi+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: aakozimindigag
     aakozi+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: aakoziminbanan
     aakozi+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: aakoziminbanag
     aakozi+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: aakozimingobanan
     aakozi+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: aakozimingobanag
     aakozi+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: aakozimdigan
     aakozi+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: aakozimdigag
     aakozi+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: aakozimbanan
     aakozi+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: aakozimbanag
     aakozi+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: aakozimgobanan
     aakozi+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: aakozimgobanag
     aakozi+Px3+Dub+3Obv: aakoziwdigan
     aakozi+Px3+Dub+3Pl: aakoziwdigag
     aakozi+Px3+Pret+3Obv: aakoziwbanan
     aakozi+Px3+Pret+3Pl: aakoziwbanag
     aakozi+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: aakoziwgobanan
     aakozi+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: aakoziwgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Dub: niaakozisiimindig
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret: niaakozisiiminban
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+PretDub: niaakozisiimingoban
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Dub: niaakozisiimdig
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret: niaakozisiimban
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+PretDub: niaakozisiimgoban
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Dub: niaakozisiiwdig
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Pret: niaakozisiiwban
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+PretDub: niaakozisiiwgoban
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Dub: giaakozisiimindig
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret: giaakozisiiminban
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+PretDub: giaakozisiimingoban
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Dub: giaakozisiimdig
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret: giaakozisiimban
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+PretDub: giaakozisiimgoban
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Dub: giaakozisiiwdig
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Pret: giaakozisiiwban
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+PretDub: giaakozisiiwgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+3Obv: niaakozisiiminan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+3Pl: niaakozisiiminag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+3Obv: niaakozisiiman
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+3Pl: niaakozisiimag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+3Obv: niaakozisiiwan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+3Pl: niaakozisiiwag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+3Obv: giaakozisiiminan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+3Pl: giaakozisiiminag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+3Obv: giaakozisiiman
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+3Pl: giaakozisiimag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+3Obv: giaakozisiiwan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+3Pl: giaakozisiiwag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Dub+3Obv: niaakozisiidigan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Dub+3Pl: niaakozisiidigag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Pret+3Obv: niaakozisiibanan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Pret+3Pl: niaakozisiibanag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+PretDub+3Obv: niaakozisiigobanan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+PretDub+3Pl: niaakozisiigobanag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Dub+3Obv: giaakozisiidigan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Dub+3Pl: giaakozisiidigag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Pret+3Obv: giaakozisiibanan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Pret+3Pl: giaakozisiibanag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+PretDub+3Obv: giaakozisiigobanan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+PretDub+3Pl: giaakozisiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: niaakozimindigan
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: niaakozimindigag
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: niaakoziminbanan
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: niaakoziminbanag
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: niaakozimingobanan
     Px1+aakozi+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: niaakozimingobanag
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: niaakozimdigan
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: niaakozimdigag
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: niaakozimbanan
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: niaakozimbanag
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: niaakozimgobanan
     Px1+aakozi+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: niaakozimgobanag
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+Dub+3Obv: niaakoziwdigan
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+Dub+3Pl: niaakoziwdigag
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+Pret+3Obv: niaakoziwbanan
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+Pret+3Pl: niaakoziwbanag
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: niaakoziwgobanan
     Px1+aakozi+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: niaakoziwgobanag
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: giaakozimindigan
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: giaakozimindigag
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: giaakoziminbanan
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: giaakoziminbanag
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: giaakozimingobanan
     Px2+aakozi+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: giaakozimingobanag
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: giaakozimdigan
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: giaakozimdigag
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: giaakozimbanan
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: giaakozimbanag
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: giaakozimgobanan
     Px2+aakozi+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: giaakozimgobanag
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+Dub+3Obv: giaakoziwdigan
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+Dub+3Pl: giaakoziwdigag
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+Pret+3Obv: giaakoziwbanan
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+Pret+3Pl: giaakoziwbanag
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: giaakoziwgobanan
     Px2+aakozi+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: giaakoziwgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: aakozisiimindigan
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: aakozisiimindigag
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: aakozisiiminbanan
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: aakozisiiminbanag
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: aakozisiimingobanan
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: aakozisiimingobanag
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: aakozisiimdigan
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: aakozisiimdigag
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: aakozisiimbanan
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: aakozisiimbanag
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: aakozisiimgobanan
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: aakozisiimgobanag
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Obv: aakozisiiwdigan
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Pl: aakozisiiwdigag
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Obv: aakozisiiwbanan
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Pl: aakozisiiwbanag
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: aakozisiiwgobanan
     aakozi+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: aakozisiiwgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: niaakozisiimindigan
